Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.460

Jurisdiction and venue.

The designation or maintenance in this state of a registered agent does not by itself create the basis for personal jurisdiction over the represented entity in this state. The address of the agent does not determine venue in an action or a proceeding involving the entity.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1413.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.